Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1005
Loan, defined.

Loan shall mean an extension of credit by a utility from its own capital or from capital raised by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority pursuant to sections 58-201 to 58-272 to or for the benefit of a customer solely for the purchase or installation of energy conservation measures with repayment to be made through the utility's periodic billing system.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 18;

Laws 1982, LB 799, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 76.